Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-192.01
Board of Parole Grant Awards Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Board of Parole Grant Awards Cash Fund is created. All funds received by virtue of public grants awarded to the Board of Parole shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. The fund shall be utilized by the board for the purposes stated in the individual grant applications and awards. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2018, LB841, § 23.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.